Utah statutes.
53-3-217.   License to be carried when driving motor vehicle -- Production in court -- Violation.

(1) (a)  The licensee shall have his license certificate in his immediate possession at all times when driving a motor vehicle.

(b)  A licensee shall display his license certificate upon demand of a justice of peace, a peace officer, or a field deputy or inspector of the division.

(2)  It is a defense to a charge under this section that the person charged produces in court a license certificate issued to him and valid at the time of his citation or arrest.

(3)  A person who violates Subsection (1)(a) is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

